Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.280

ESD superintendent's powers and duties—Records and reports.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, each educational service district superintendent shall:

(1) Perform such recordkeeping, including such annual reports as may be required, and liaison and informational services to local school districts and the superintendent of public instruction as required by rule or regulation of the superintendent of public instruction or state board of education: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education may require some or all of the school districts to report information directly when such reporting procedures are deemed desirable or feasible.

(2) Keep records of official acts of the educational service district board and superintendents in accordance with *RCW 28A.21.120, as now or hereafter amended.

(3) Preserve carefully all reports of school officers and teachers and deliver to the successor of the office all records, books, documents, and papers belonging to the office either personally or through a personal representative, taking a receipt for the same, which shall be filed in the office of the county auditor in the county where the office is located.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 25; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.21.111.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.21.120 was recodified as RCW 28A.310.310 pursuant to 1990 c 33 s 4.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.